Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.510

Duty to disclose or withhold information—Otherwise provided.

Nothing in RCW 42.56.250 and 42.56.330 shall affect a positive duty of an agency to disclose or a positive duty to withhold information which duty to disclose or withhold is contained in any other law.

[ 2005 c 274 s 287; 1991 c 23 s 11; 1990 c 256 s 2; 1987 c 404 s 3. Formerly RCW 42.17.311.]